Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4056.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $9,000,000, for the purpose of offsetting potential increases in
landowner forest patrol assessments.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 24